Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-518
Register of deeds; terms; continuation of office; when; qualifications; partisan ballot.

Except as provided in section 22-417, (1) a register of deeds shall be elected in each county having a population of more than twenty thousand and not more than four hundred thousand inhabitants at the statewide general election in 1962 and each four years thereafter and in counties having a population in excess of four hundred thousand inhabitants at the statewide general election in 1964 and each four years thereafter and (2) if the population of a county which has a separate office of register of deeds pursuant to this section falls below twenty thousand inhabitants after establishing such an office or if a county which has a separate office of register of deeds immediately prior to July 10, 1990, has a population of twenty thousand inhabitants or less, the office of the register of deeds shall continue and the officer shall be elected pursuant to this section as if the county had a population of more than twenty thousand and not more than four hundred thousand inhabitants. The term of the register of deeds shall be four years or until his or her successor is elected and qualified. The register of deeds shall meet the qualifications found in section 23-1501. The register of deeds shall be elected on the partisan ballot.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 114;

Laws 1996, LB 1085, § 45.

The County Manager Act, held unconstitutional, did not abolish the office of register of deeds in counties where that form of government was adopted. The 1933 amendment to this section did not repeal the County Manager Act. State ex rel. O'Connor v. Tusa, 130 Neb. 528, 265 N.W. 524 (1936).

Under former law this section authorized the election of a register of deeds in only those counties having the required population, as determined by the last preceding state or national census, at the date of the election. State ex rel. Miller v. Lewis, 38 Neb. 191, 56 N.W. 885 (1893).